Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska66-1227
Methyl tertiary butyl ether; restriction.

On or after July 13, 2000, a retailer shall not offer for sale in this state any petroleum product that contains more than one percent of methyl tertiary butyl ether (MTBE) by volume. For purposes of this section, retailer has the same definition as in section 66-482.

Laws 2000, LB 1234, § 17.